Utah statutes.
73-22-3.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Correlative rights" mean the rights of each geothermal owner in a
geothermal area to produce without waste his just and equitable share of the
geothermal resource underlying the geothermal area.
(2)  "Division" means the Division of Water Rights, Department of Natural
Resources.
(3)  "Geothermal area" means the general land area which is underlain or
reasonably appears to be underlain by geothermal resources.
(4)  "Geothermal fluid" means water and steam at temperatures greater than 120
degrees centigrade naturally present in a geothermal system.
(5)  "Geothermal resource" means: (a) the natural heat of the earth at
temperatures greater than 120 degrees centigrade; and (b) the energy, in
whatever form, including pressure, present in, resulting from, created by, or
which may be extracted from that natural heat, directly or through a material
medium. Geothermal resource does not include geothermal fluids.
(6)  "Geothermal system" means any strata, pool, reservoir, or other geologic
formation containing geothermal resources.
(7)  "Material medium" means geothermal fluids, or water and other substances
artificially introduced into a geothermal system to serve as a heat transfer
medium.
(8)  "Operator" means any person drilling, maintaining, operating, producing,
or in control of any well.
(9)  "Owner" means a person who has the right to drill into, produce, and make
use of the geothermal resource.
(10)  "Person" means any individual, business entity (corporate or otherwise),
or political subdivision of this or any other state.
(11)  "Waste" means any inefficient, excessive, or improper production, use,
or dissipation of geothermal resources.  Wasteful practices include, but are
not limited to: (a) transporting or storage methods that cause or tend to
cause unnecessary surface loss of geothermal resources; or (b) locating,
spacing, constructing, equipping, operating, producing, or venting of any well
in a manner that results or tends to result in unnecessary surface loss or in
reducing the ultimate economic recovery of geothermal resources.
(12)  "Well" means any well drilled, converted, or reactivated for the
discovery, testing, production, or subsurface injection of geothermal
resources.
